Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-108.02
Director of Correctional Services; establish facilities and programs; assignment of prisoners; basis.

The Director of Correctional Services shall establish facilities and programs for persons committed to the Department of Correctional Services. The assignment to such programs shall be based on the evaluation and recommendation from the Diagnostic and Evaluation Center. The director shall not classify prisoners committed to the department into separate dwelling units solely on the basis of race; except that any prisoner may be isolated for insubordination, security, or rehabilitation.

Laws 1963, c. 528, § 6, p. 1657;

Laws 1967, c. 601, § 1, p. 2043;

Laws 1980, LB 794, § 1.